Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201115-1017
Pension funds; investment; reports.

(1) A city of the primary class which has a city pension and retirement
plan or fund, or a city fire and police pension plan or fund, or both, may
provide by ordinance as authorized by its home rule charter, and not prohibited
by the Constitution of Nebraska, for the investment of any plan or fund, and
it may provide that (a) such a city shall place in trust any part of such
plan or fund, (b) it shall place in trust any part of any such plan or fund
with a corporate trustee in Nebraska, or (c) it shall purchase any part of
any such plan from a life insurance company licensed to do business in the
State of Nebraska. The powers conferred by this section shall be independent
of and in addition and supplemental to any other provisions of the laws of
the State of Nebraska with reference to the matters covered hereby and this
section shall be considered as a complete and independent act and not as amendatory
of or limited by any other provision of the laws of the State of Nebraska.

(2)(a) Beginning December 31, 1998, and each December 31 thereafter,
the clerk of a city of the primary class shall file with the Public Employees
Retirement Board an annual report on each retirement plan established pursuant
to this section, section 15-1026, and section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code and shall submit copies of such report to the Auditor
of Public Accounts. The Auditor of Public Accounts may prepare a review of
such report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not required to do so. The
annual report shall be in a form prescribed by the Public Employees Retirement
Board and shall contain the following information for each such retirement
plan:

(i) The number of persons participating in the retirement plan;

(ii) The contribution rates of participants in the plan;

(iii) Plan assets and liabilities;

(iv) The names and positions of persons administering the plan;

(v) The names and positions of persons investing plan assets;

(vi) The form and nature of investments;

(vii) For each defined contribution plan, a full description of investment
policies and options available to plan participants; and

(viii) For each defined benefit plan, the levels of benefits of participants
in the plan, the number of members who are eligible for a benefit, and the
total present value of such members' benefits, as well as the funding sources
which will pay for such benefits.

If a plan contains no current active participants, the city clerk may
file in place of such report a statement with the Public Employees Retirement
Board indicating the number of retirees still drawing benefits, and the sources
and amount of funding for such benefits.

(b) Beginning December 31, 1998, and every four years thereafter, if
such retirement plan is a defined benefit plan, the city council of a city
of the primary class shall cause to be prepared a quadrennial report and shall
file the same with the Public Employees Retirement Board and submit to the Auditor
of Public Accounts a copy of such report. The Auditor of Public Accounts may prepare a review of such
report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not required to do so. The
report shall consist of a full actuarial analysis of each such retirement
plan established pursuant to this section and section 15-1026. The analysis
shall be prepared by an independent private organization or public entity
employing actuaries who are members in good standing of the American Academy
of Actuaries, and which organization or entity has demonstrated expertise
to perform this type of analysis and is unrelated to any organization offering
investment advice or which provides investment management services to the
retirement plan.

Laws 1967, c. 52, § 1, p. 188;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 795, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB474, § 6.